New Jersey, session 221, A1973.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. a.  The Commissioner of Health shall require 2[every hospital in the State, every birthing center licensed in the State pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.), every federally qualified health center, and]2 every 1licensed1 physician or health care practitioner in the State providing 1perinatal1 care to a pregnant person or a person who has given birth, to 1[screen] refer1 the person for 1an1 endometriosis 3[1screen1] evaluation3 if the person has been diagnosed with preeclampsia and subsequently shows symptoms of endometriosis.  1[The screening tools shall be based on industry best practices and guidance, as determined by the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists or another nationally-recognized body as may be designated by the commissioner.]1 b. 1[A hospital, a licensed birthing center, or a federally qualified health center providing care to, or a physician or other health care practitioner] The Board of Medical Examiners shall require every obstetric care provider1 who is the primary caregiver for 1[,]1 a pregnant person or a person who seeks 1[treatment] perinatal care1 within six weeks of giving birth 3[shall] to3, in accordance with 1nationally recognized1 guidelines 1[developed by the commissioner]1: (1) provide the person with information1, developed by the New Jersey Department of Health,1 on endometriosis and potential warning signs and symptoms 1[through the educational program developed pursuant subsection d. of this section]1; (2) inform the person of the benefits of being 3[screened] evaluated3 for endometriosis if the person has been diagnosed with preeclampsia and subsequently shows symptoms of endometriosis 2[, and that the person is 1[required]1 to be screened for endometriosis unless the person issues a written refusal to be screened, which refusal shall be provided on a form and in a manner prescribed by the commissioner]2 1[consistent with the provisions of subsection c. of this section]1; and (3) 3[screen] evaluate3 the person for endometriosis 1or refer the person to a qualified obstetric care provider for an endometriosis 3[screen1] evaluation3 unless the person provides written refusal 2[, as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection]2.  1[The person shall, on the form and in a manner prescribed by the commissioner consistent with subsection c. of this section, acknowledge receipt of the information provided by the hospital, birthing center, federally qualified health center, physician, or health care practitioner, as applicable, regarding the benefits of being screened for endometriosis]1 3.3            1[c.  The commissioner shall develop a standardized form to be used for the purposes of providing the acknowledgement required pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection b. of this section, which may also be used to provide written refusal to undergo a screening for endometriosis pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection b. of this section, if applicable.]1      1[d.] c.1  The commissioner shall develop, in consultation with the Endometriosis Foundation of America and any other community-based organization as may be designated by the commissioner, 2[an endometriosis]2 educational 2[program] information concerning endometriosis2 for pregnant individuals and individuals who have recently given birth 3[who] and3 have been diagnosed with preeclampsia and subsequently show symptoms of endometriosis.  The educational 2[program] information provided2 shall include information on endometriosis and the potential warning signs and symptoms of endometriosis. 1[e.] d.1  Upon receipt of 1[the results of any screening conducted] a referral for an endometriosis 3[screen1] evaluation3 pursuant to subsection a. 1or b.1 of this section, the 1[hospital, licensed birthing center, federally qualified health center, or physician or health care practitioner, as applicable,] obstetric care provider1 shall 1perform 3[a screen] an evaluation3 and1 discuss the results with the person and, if the person has a positive 3[screening for] diagnosis of3 endometriosis, develop a treatment plan to minimize the persons risk from endometriosis. 2.  The 1[Commissioner of Health] Board of Medical Examiners1, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this act. 3.  This act shall take effect 1[immediately] 180 days after the date of enactment1.